Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-265.01
Pre-kindergarten through second grade students; suspension; prohibited; exceptions.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, an elementary school shall not suspend a student in pre-kindergarten through second grade. Each school district shall develop a policy to implement this section which shall include disciplinary measures inside the school as an alternative to suspension.

(2) An elementary school may suspend a student in pre-kindergarten through second grade if such student:

(a) Brings a deadly weapon as defined in section 28-109 onto school grounds, into a vehicle owned, leased, or contracted by a school being used for a school purpose or into a vehicle being driven for a school purpose by a school employee or his or her designee, or to a school-sponsored activity or athletic event; or

(b) Engages in violent behavior capable of causing physical harm to another student or school employee.

Laws 2023, LB705, § 60;

Laws 2026, LB653, § 3.
July 18, 2026